Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0403.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7333c. (1) A pharmacist who receives a lawful order from a prescriber for addiction medication shall make a good-faith effort to fill the order without undue delay. If the pharmacy does not have the addiction medication in stock, the pharmacist shall offer to do 1 or more of the following for the patient: (a) Obtain the addiction medication using the pharmacy's standard expedited ordering procedure. (b) Locate a pharmacy that is reasonably accessible to the patient that has the addiction medication in stock and transfer the order to that pharmacy using the transferring pharmacy's standard transfer procedure. (2) If an addiction medication is prescribed to a patient on a prescription form and is not filled at the pharmacy, the pharmacist shall return the prescription form to the patient on the patient's request. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Addiction medication" means a controlled substance to treat or manage an opioid use disorder. (b) "Undue delay" means a delay intended to obstruct a patient's access to the addiction medication or that is not a valid delay. (c) "Valid delay" means a delay caused by fulfilling the requirements of this article, part 177, or a rule promulgated under this article or part 177, or any other delay commonly associated with the practice of pharmacy.